apertium-bre.bre.dix
    <pardef n="d/a__pr">
      <e><p><l>a</l><r>a<s n="pr"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>in</l><r>a<s n="pr"/><j/>indirect<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>it</l><r>a<s n="pr"/><j/>indirect<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ezhañ</l><r>a<s n="pr"/><j/>indirect<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ezhi</l><r>a<s n="pr"/><j/>indirect<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>imp</l><r>a<s n="pr"/><j/>indirect<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>eomp</l><r>a<s n="pr"/><j/>indirect<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>eoc’h</l><r>a<s n="pr"/><j/>indirect<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ezhe</l><r>a<s n="pr"/><j/>indirect<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ezho</l><r>a<s n="pr"/><j/>indirect<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="etrezek__pr">
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="pr"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l><b/>ennon</l><r><s n="pr"/><j/>indirect<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l><b/>ennout</l><r><s n="pr"/><j/>indirect<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l><b/>ennañ</l><r><s n="pr"/><j/>indirect<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l><b/>enni</l><r><s n="pr"/><j/>indirect<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l><b/>ennomp</l><r><s n="pr"/><j/>indirect<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l><b/>ennoc’h</l><r><s n="pr"/><j/>indirect<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l><b/>enno</l><r><s n="pr"/><j/>indirect<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="/nemet__pr">
      <e><p><l>nemet</l><r>nemet<s n="pr"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>’met</l><r>nemet<s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>nemedon</l><r>nemet<s n="pr"/><j/>indirect<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>nemedout</l><r>nemet<s n="pr"/><j/>indirect<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>nemetañ</l><r>nemet<s n="pr"/><j/>indirect<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>nemeti</l><r>nemet<s n="pr"/><j/>indirect<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>nemedomp</l><r>nemet<s n="pr"/><j/>indirect<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>nemedoc’h</l><r>nemet<s n="pr"/><j/>indirect<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>nemeto</l><r>nemet<s n="pr"/><j/>indirect<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>nemete</l><r>nemet<s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="paneve/t__pr">
      <e><p><l>t</l><r>t<s n="pr"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>don</l><r>t<s n="pr"/><j/>indirect<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>dout</l><r>t<s n="pr"/><j/>indirect<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tañ</l><r>t<s n="pr"/><j/>indirect<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ti</l><r>t<s n="pr"/><j/>indirect<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>domp</l><r>t<s n="pr"/><j/>indirect<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>doc’h</l><r>t<s n="pr"/><j/>indirect<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>to</l><r>t<s n="pr"/><j/>indirect<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>te</l><r>t<s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="keneve__pr">
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="pr"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>don</l><r><s n="pr"/><j/>indirect<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>dout</l><r><s n="pr"/><j/>indirect<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tañ</l><r><s n="pr"/><j/>indirect<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ti</l><r><s n="pr"/><j/>indirect<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>domp</l><r><s n="pr"/><j/>indirect<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>doc’h</l><r><s n="pr"/><j/>indirect<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>to</l><r><s n="pr"/><j/>indirect<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>te</l><r><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>	
	
	
    <pardef n="evi/t__pr">
      <e><p><l>t</l><r>t<s n="pr"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>don</l><r>t<s n="pr"/><j/>indirect<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>din</l><r>t<s n="pr"/><j/>indirect<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ton</l><r>t<s n="pr"/><j/>indirect<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>dout</l><r>t<s n="pr"/><j/>indirect<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tañ</l><r>t<s n="pr"/><j/>indirect<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ti</l><r>t<s n="pr"/><j/>indirect<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>domp</l><r>t<s n="pr"/><j/>indirect<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>doc’h</l><r>t<s n="pr"/><j/>indirect<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>te</l><r>t<s n="pr"/><j/>indirect<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>to</l><r>t<s n="pr"/><j/>indirect<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="betek__pr">
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="pr"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l><b/>ennon</l><r><s n="pr"/><j/>indirect<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l><b/>ennout</l><r><s n="pr"/><j/>indirect<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l><b/>ennañ</l><r><s n="pr"/><j/>indirect<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l><b/>enni</l><r><s n="pr"/><j/>indirect<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l><b/>ennomp</l><r><s n="pr"/><j/>indirect<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l><b/>ennoc’h</l><r><s n="pr"/><j/>indirect<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l><b/>enno</l><r><s n="pr"/><j/>indirect<s n="prn"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="abalamour da"><i>abalamour<b/>d</i><par n="d/a__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="a-drugarez da"><i>a-drugarez<b/>d</i><par n="d/a__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="a drugarez da"><p><l>a<b/>drugarez<b/>d</l><r>a-drugarez<b/>d</r></p><par n="d/a__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="a-enep da"><i>a-enep<b/>d</i><par n="d/a__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="a-is da"><i>a-is<b/>d</i><par n="d/a__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="a-us da"><i>a-us<b/>d</i><par n="d/a__pr"/></e>
      <e lm="a-uc’h da"><p><l>a-uc’h<b/>da</l><r>a-us<b/>d</r></p><par n="d/a__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="a-wel da"><i>a-wel<b/>d</i><par n="d/a__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="daoust da"><i>daoust<b/>d</i><par n="d/a__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="en abeg da"><i>en<b/>abeg<b/>d</i><par n="d/a__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="en desped da"><i>en<b/>desped<b/>d</i><par n="d/a__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="en-dro da"><i>en-dro<b/>d</i><par n="d/a__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="end-eeun da"><i>end-eeun<b/>d</i><par n="d/a__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="en engortoz da"><i>en<b/>engortoz<b/>d</i><par n="d/a__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="en tu all da"><i>en<b/>tu<b/>all<b/>d</i><par n="d/a__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="e-skoaz da"><i>e-skoaz<b/>d</i><par n="d/a__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="kent da"><i>kent<b/>d</i><par n="d/a__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="kuit da"><i>kuit<b/>d</i><par n="d/a__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="tost da"><i>tost<b/>d</i><par n="d/a__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="tostik da"><i>tostik<b/>d</i><par n="d/a__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="tro-dro da"><i>tro-dro<b/>d</i><par n="d/a__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="trugarez da"><i>trugarez<b/>d</i><par n="d/a__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="war var da"><i>war<b/>var<b/>d</i><par n="d/a__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="betek"><par n="initial-b"/><i>etek</i><par n="betek__pr"/></e>
      <e lm="bete"><par n="initial-b"/><p><l>ete</l><r>etek</r></p><par n="betek__pr"/></e>
      <e lm="beket"><par n="initial-b"/><p><l>eket</l><r>etek</r></p><par n="betek__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="da"><i>d</i><par n="d/a__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="etrezek"><i>etrezek</i><par n="etrezek__pr"/></e>
	<e lm="estrevit"><i>estrevi</i><par n="evi/t__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="evit"><i>evi</i><par n="evi/t__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="evit" r="LR"><p><l>’vi</l><r>evi</r></p><par n="evi/t__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="nemet"><i></i><par n="/nemet__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="panevet"><i>paneve</i><par n="paneve/t__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="keneve" r="LR"><i>keneve</i><par n="keneve__pr"/></e>
